Missouri, session 2026, SB1378.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 170, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 170.025, to read as
follows:
170.025. Each school district and charter school may
establish a program designed to ensure that:
(1) Each elementary school under the control of such
school district or charter school provides instruction in
cursive writing so that students create readable documents
through legible cursive handwriting by the end of the fifth
grade; and
(2) Each student passes with proficiency a teacher-
constructed test demonstrating competency in both reading
and writing cursive.
✓